California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(4) In lieu of making the allocations of annual tax increment pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, the auditor shall for the 1989–90 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, allocate the amount of property tax revenue determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 98 to jurisdictions in the tax rate area, except an excluded tax rate area, using the proportionate shares derived pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) For purposes of the calculations made pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, in the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts that would have
 been allocated to all tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, of qualifying cities pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed to be the “amount of property tax revenue allocated to those tax rate areas in the prior fiscal year.”

(c) “TEA formula” means the Tax Equity Allocation formula, and shall be calculated by the auditor for each qualifying city as follows:

(1) For the 1988–89 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the auditor shall determine the total amount of property tax revenue to be allocated to all jurisdictions in all tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, within the qualifying city, before the allocation and payment of funds in that fiscal year to a community redevelopment agency within the qualifying city, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The auditor shall determine the amount of funds allocated in each fiscal year to those tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, within a community redevelopment agency in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) (A) The auditor shall determine the total amount of funds paid in each fiscal year by a community redevelopment agency within the city to jurisdictions other than the city pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33401 and Section 33676 of the Health and Safety Code, and the cost to the redevelopment agency of any land or facilities transferred and any amounts paid to jurisdictions other than the city to assist in the construction or reconstruction of facilities pursuant to an agreement entered into under Section 33401 or 33445.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Of the total amount
 determined in subparagraph (A), the auditor shall compute a proportionate amount to be attributed to all tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, within the community redevelopment agency. That proportionate amount shall be equal to that proportion which the amount determined in paragraph (2) in each fiscal year bears to the total amount of funds allocated in each fiscal year to a community redevelopment agency in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) The auditor shall subtract the amount determined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) from the amount determined in paragraph (2).

(5) The auditor shall subtract the amount determined in paragraph (4) from the amount determined in paragraph (1).

(6) The amount computed in paragraph (5) shall be multiplied by the
 following percentages in order to determine the TEA formula amount to be distributed to the qualifying city in each fiscal year:

(A) For the first fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 1 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(B) For the second fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 2 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(C) For the third fiscal year in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 3 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(D) For the fourth fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter in which the qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, 4
 percent of the amount determined in paragraph (5).

(d) For purposes of this section, “excluded tax rate area” means either of the following:

(1) Any tax rate area included in territory annexed by the qualifying city and allocated a prescribed percentage of property tax revenue pursuant to an existing agreement between the qualifying city and the county.

(2) Any tax rate area described in paragraph (1) that was detached from the county library district and that is also allocated an additional prescribed percentage of property tax revenue pursuant to an existing agreement between the qualifying city and the county.

(e) (1) All existing agreements between the qualifying city and the county covering the allocation of property tax
 revenues to tax rate areas described in subdivision (d) shall remain in force.

(2) All existing agreements between the qualifying city and the county covering the allocation of property tax revenues to tax rate areas that were detached from the county library district but are not included in territory that was annexed by the qualifying city shall remain in force.

(3) All allocations to those tax rate areas described in subdivision (d), including allocations of annual tax increments, made pursuant to the existing agreements between the qualifying city and the county shall be governed by subdivision (a) of Section 96.1 and Section 96.5.

(4) All allocations to those tax rate areas described in paragraph (2), including allocations of annual tax increments, made pursuant to the existing agreements between the qualifying
 city and the county shall be governed by subdivision (a) of Section 96.1 and Section 96.5. However, the tax rate areas referred to in this paragraph shall also be distributed an amount of property tax revenue determined pursuant to the TEA formula that is over and above the amount allocated as provided in the preceding sentence.

(f) “Qualifying city” means any city that incorporated prior to June 5, 1987, and had an amount of property tax revenue allocated to it pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 96.1 or its predecessor section in the 1988–89 fiscal year that is less than 4 percent of the amount of property tax revenue computed as follows:

(1) The auditor shall determine the total amount of property tax revenue allocated to all tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, in the city in the 1988–89 fiscal year.

(2) The auditor shall subtract the amount in the 1988–89 fiscal year determined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) from the amount determined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(3) The auditor shall subtract the amount determined in paragraph (2) from the amount of property tax revenue in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(4) The auditor shall divide the amount of property tax revenue determined in paragraph (1) of this subdivision by the amount of property tax revenue determined in paragraph (3) of this subdivision.

(5) If the quotient determined in paragraph (4) of this subdivision is less than 0.04, the city is a qualifying city. If the quotient determined in that paragraph is equal to or greater than 0.04, the city is not a qualifying city.

(g) The auditor may assess each qualifying city its proportional share of the actual costs of making the calculations required by this section, and may deduct that assessment from the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (b). For purposes of this subdivision, a qualifying city’s proportional share of the auditor’s actual costs shall not exceed the proportion it receives of the total amounts excluded in the county pursuant to subdivision (a).

(h) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), in any fiscal year in which a qualifying city receives a distribution pursuant to this section, the auditor shall reduce the actual amount distributed to the qualifying city by the amount of revenue not collected by the qualifying city in the first fiscal year following the city’s reduction after January 1, 1988, of the tax rate or tax
 base of any locally imposed general or special tax. The amount so computed by the auditor shall constitute a reduction in the amount of property tax revenue distributed to the qualifying city pursuant to this section in each succeeding fiscal year. That amount shall be aggregated with any additional amount computed pursuant to this paragraph as the result of the city’s reduction in any subsequent year of the tax rate or tax base of the same or any other locally imposed general or special tax.

(2) No reduction shall be made pursuant to paragraph (1) in the case in which a local tax is reduced or eliminated as a result of either a court decision or the approval or rejection of a ballot measure by the voters.

(i) If the auditor determines that the amount to be distributed to a qualifying city pursuant to subdivision (b), as modified by subdivisions (g) and (h), would result in a
 qualifying city having proceeds of taxes in excess of its appropriation limit, the auditor shall reduce the amount, on a dollar-for-dollar basis, by the amount that exceeds the city’s appropriations limit.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no qualifying city shall be distributed an amount pursuant to this section that is less than the amount the city would have been allocated without the application of the TEA formula.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, commencing with the 1994–95 fiscal year, the auditor shall not reduce the amount distributed to a qualifying city under this section by reason of that city becoming the successor agency to a special district that is dissolved, merged with that city, or becomes a subsidiary district of that city, on or after July 1, 1994.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, in no event may the auditor reduce the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise allocated to a qualifying city pursuant to this section on the basis of any additional ad valorem property tax revenues received by that city pursuant to a services for revenue agreement. For purposes of this subdivision, a “services for revenue agreement” means any agreement between a qualifying city and the county in which it is located, entered into by joint resolution of that city and that county, under which additional service responsibilities are exchanged in consideration for additional property tax revenues.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing with the
 2012–13 fiscal year, the auditor shall not reduce the amount distributed to the City of Simi Valley under this section by reason of that city receiving, pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 99, property taxes previously allocated to a maintenance or improvement district.

(B) The City of Simi Valley shall reimburse the auditor for the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the auditor to administer this paragraph.

(l) The amount not distributed as a result of this section to the tax rate areas, except excluded tax rate areas, in each qualifying city shall be allocated by the auditor to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 319, Sec. 1.   (AB 468)   Effective September 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

98.03.

For purposes of Section 98, the definition of qualifying city contained in subdivision (d) of that section shall not include the City of Foster City.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

98.1.

(a) In the County of Orange, the computations made pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, for the 1984–85 fiscal year only, shall be modified as follows:

(1) With respect to tax rate areas within the boundaries of a qualifying city, there shall be excluded from the aggregate amount of “property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this chapter to local agencies, other than for a qualifying city, in the prior fiscal year,” an amount equal to the sum of amounts calculated pursuant to the TEA formula, as defined in subdivision (c).

(2) The amount excluded pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be subtracted from the allocations of all local agencies other than a qualifying city with tax rate areas within the boundaries of a qualifying city in proportion to each such local agency’s share of the total 1983–84 property tax revenues, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 95, allocated to all those tax rate areas.

(b) (1) Each qualifying city, as defined in subdivision (d), shall for the 1984–85 fiscal year only, be allocated by the auditor an amount determined pursuant to the TEA formula, as defined in subdivision (c).

(2) For each qualifying city, the auditor shall distribute the amount determined pursuant to the TEA formula to all tax rate areas within the city in proportion to each tax rate area’s share of the total 1983–84 assessed value in the city.

(3) After making the allocations, pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) but before making the calculations pursuant to Section 96.5, the auditor shall, for all tax rate areas in the qualifying city, calculate the proportionate share of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this section and Section 96.1 in the 1984–85 fiscal year to each jurisdiction in the tax rate area.

(4) In lieu of making the allocations of annual tax increment pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, the auditor shall for the 1984–85 fiscal year only, allocate the amount of property tax revenue determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 96.5 or its predecessor section to jurisdictions in the tax rate area using the proportionate shares derived pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) For purposes of the calculations made pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, in the 1985–86 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, the amounts allocated to qualifying cities pursuant to this subdivision (notwithstanding any deduction made pursuant to subdivision (e)) shall be deemed to be the “amount of property tax revenue allocated pursuant to this chapter in the prior fiscal year.”

(c) “TEA formula” shall mean Tax Equity Allocation formula, and shall be calculated by the auditor by applying a tax rate of ten cents ($.10) per $100 assessed value to the 1983–84 assessed value of the qualifying city.

(d) “Qualifying city” shall mean any city in the County of Orange that existed but did not levy a property tax in the 1977–78 fiscal year.

(e) The auditor may assess each qualifying city its proportional share of the actual costs of making the calculations required by this section, and may deduct that assessment from the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (b). For purposes of this subdivision, a qualifying city’s proportional share of the auditor’s actual costs shall not exceed the proportion it receives of the total amounts excluded in the county pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

98.2.

For the 2011–12 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the computations provided for in Sections 98 and 98.1 shall be performed in a manner which recognizes that passthrough payments formerly required under the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code) are continuing to be made under the authority of Part 1.85 (commencing with Section 34170) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code and those payments shall be recognized in the TEA calculations as though they were made under the Community Redevelopment Law. Additionally, the computations provided for in Sections 98 and 98.1 shall be performed in a manner that recognizes payments to a Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section
 34170.5 of the Health and Safety Code as if they were payments to a redevelopment agency as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 9.   (AB 26 1x)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Jurisdictional Changes and Negotiated Transfers [99. - 99.3.]

99.

(a) For the purposes of the computations required by this chapter:

(1) In the case of a jurisdictional change, other than a city incorporation, city disincorporation, or a formation of a district as defined in Section 2215, the auditor shall adjust the allocation of property tax revenue determined pursuant to Section 96 or 96.1, or the annual tax increment determined pursuant to Section 96.5, for local agencies whose service area or service responsibility would be altered by the jurisdictional change, as determined pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c).

(2) In the case of a city incorporation or disincorporation, the auditor shall assign the allocation of property tax revenues determined pursuant to Section
 56810 of the Government Code and the adjustments in tax revenues that may occur pursuant to Section 56815 of the Government Code to the newly formed city or district and shall make the adjustment as determined by Section 56810 or 56813 in the allocation of property tax revenue determined pursuant to Section 96 or 96.1 for each local agency whose service area or service responsibilities would be altered by the incorporation.

(3) In the case of a formation of a district as defined in Section 2215, the auditor shall assign the allocation of property tax revenues determined pursuant to Section 56810 of the Government Code to the district and shall make the adjustment as determined by Section 56810, or for the disincorporated city or dissolved district as determined by Section 56813, in the allocation of property tax revenue determined pursuant to Section 96 or 96.1 for each local agency whose service area or service responsibilities would be
 altered by the change of organization.

(b) Upon the filing of an application or a resolution pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code), but prior to the issuance of a certificate of filing, the executive officer shall give notice of the filing to the assessor and auditor of each county within which the territory subject to the jurisdictional change is located. This notice shall specify each local agency whose service area or responsibility will be altered by the jurisdictional change.

(1) (A) The county assessor shall provide to the county auditor, within 30 days of the notice of filing, a report which identifies the assessed valuations for the territory subject to the jurisdictional change and the tax rate area or areas in which the
 territory exists.

(B) The auditor shall estimate the amount of property tax revenue generated within the territory that is the subject of the jurisdictional change during the current fiscal year.

(2) The auditor shall estimate what proportion of the property tax revenue determined pursuant to paragraph (1) is attributable to each local agency pursuant to Sections 96.1 and 96.5.

(3) Within 45 days of notice of the filing of an application or resolution, the auditor shall notify the governing body of each local agency whose service area or service responsibility will be altered by the jurisdictional change of the amount of, and allocation factors with respect to, property tax revenue estimated pursuant to paragraph (2) that is subject to a negotiated exchange.

(4) Upon receipt of the estimates pursuant to paragraph (3), the local agencies shall commence negotiations to determine the amount of property tax revenues to be exchanged between and among the local agencies. Except as otherwise provided, this negotiation period shall not exceed 60 days. If a local agency involved in these negotiations notifies the other local agencies, the county auditor, and the local agency formation commission in writing of its desire to extend the negotiating period, the negotiating period shall be 90 days.

The exchange may be limited to an exchange of property tax revenues from the annual tax increment generated in the area subject to the jurisdictional change and attributable to the local agencies whose service area or service responsibilities will be altered by the proposed jurisdictional change. The final exchange resolution shall specify how the annual tax increment shall be allocated in future years.

(5) In the event that a jurisdictional change would affect the service area or service responsibility of one or more special districts, the board of supervisors of the county or counties in which the districts are located shall, on behalf of the district or districts, negotiate any exchange of property tax revenues. Prior to entering into negotiation on behalf of a district for the exchange of property tax revenue, the board shall consult with the affected district. The consultation shall include, at a minimum, notification to each member and executive officer of the district board of the pending consultation and provision of adequate opportunity to comment on the negotiation.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the executive officer shall not issue a certificate of filing pursuant to Section 56658 of the Government Code until the local agencies included in the property
 tax revenue exchange negotiation, within the negotiation period, present resolutions adopted by each such county and city whereby each county and city agrees to accept the exchange of property tax revenues.

(7) In the event that the commission modifies the proposal or its resolution of determination, any local agency whose service area or service responsibility would be altered by the proposed jurisdictional change may request, and the executive officer shall grant, 30 days for the affected agencies, pursuant to paragraph (4), to renegotiate an exchange of property tax revenues. Notwithstanding the time period specified in paragraph (4), if the resolutions required pursuant to paragraph (6) are not presented to the executive officer within the 30-day period, all proceedings of the jurisdictional change shall automatically be terminated.

(8) In the case of a jurisdictional change
 that consists of a city’s qualified annexation of unincorporated territory, an exchange of property tax revenues between the city and the county shall be determined in accordance with subdivision (e) if that exchange of revenues is not otherwise determined pursuant to either of the following:

(A) Negotiations completed within the applicable period or periods as prescribed by this subdivision.

(B) A master property tax exchange agreement among those local agencies, as described in subdivision (d).

For purposes of this paragraph, a qualified annexation of unincorporated territory means an annexation, as so described, for which an application or a resolution was filed on or after January 1, 1998, and on or before January 1, 2028.

(9) No later than the date on which the
 certificate of completion of the jurisdictional change is recorded with the county recorder, the executive officer shall notify the auditor or auditors of the exchange of property tax revenues and the auditor or auditors shall make the appropriate adjustments as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Whenever a jurisdictional change is not required to be reviewed and approved by a local agency formation commission, the local agencies whose service area or service responsibilities would be altered by the proposed change, shall give notice to the State Board of Equalization and the assessor and auditor of each county within which the territory subject to the jurisdictional change is located. This notice shall specify each local agency whose service area or responsibility will be altered by the jurisdictional change and request the auditor and assessor to make the determinations required pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b). Upon
 notification by the auditor of the amount of, and allocation factors with respect to, property tax subject to exchange, the local agencies, pursuant to the provisions of paragraphs (4) and (6) of subdivision (b), shall determine the amount of property tax revenues to be exchanged between and among the local agencies. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no such jurisdictional change shall become effective until each county and city included in these negotiations agrees, by resolution, to accept the negotiated exchange of property tax revenues. The exchange may be limited to an exchange of property tax revenue from the annual tax increment generated in the area subject to the jurisdictional change and attributable to the local agencies whose service area or service responsibilities will be altered by the proposed jurisdictional change. The final exchange resolution shall specify how the annual tax increment shall be allocated in future years. Upon the adoption of the resolutions required pursuant to
 this section, the adopting agencies shall notify the auditor who shall make the appropriate adjustments as provided in subdivision (a). Adjustments in property tax allocations made as the result of a city or library district withdrawing from a county free library system pursuant to Section 19116 of the Education Code shall be made pursuant to Section 19116 of the Education Code, and this subdivision shall not apply.

(d) With respect to adjustments in the allocation of property taxes pursuant to this section, a county and any local agency or agencies within the county may develop and adopt a master property tax transfer agreement. The agreement may be revised from time to time by the parties subject to the agreement.

(e) (1) An exchange of property tax revenues that is required by paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) to be determined pursuant to this subdivision
 shall be determined in accordance with all of the following:

(A) The city and the county shall mutually select a third-party consultant to perform a comprehensive, independent fiscal analysis, funded in equal portions by the city and the county, that specifies estimates of all tax revenues that will be derived from the annexed territory and the costs of city and county services with respect to the annexed territory. The analysis shall be completed within a period not to exceed 30 days, and shall be based upon the general plan or adopted plans and policies of the annexing city and the intended uses for the annexed territory. If, upon the completion of the analysis period, no exchange of property tax revenues is agreed upon by the city and the county, subparagraph (B) shall apply.

(B) The city and the county shall mutually select a mediator, funded in equal portions by those
 agencies, to perform mediation for a period not to exceed 30 days. If, upon the completion of the mediation period, no exchange of property tax revenues is agreed upon by the city and the county, subparagraph (C) shall apply.

(C) The city and the county shall mutually select an arbitrator, funded in equal portions by those agencies, to conduct an advisory arbitration with the city and the county for a period not to exceed 30 days. At the conclusion of this arbitration period, the city and the county shall each present to the arbitrator its last and best offer with respect to the exchange of property tax revenues. The arbitrator shall select one of the offers and recommend that offer to the governing bodies of the city and the county. If the governing body of the city or the county rejects the recommended offer, it shall do so during a public hearing, and shall, at the conclusion of that hearing, make written findings of fact as to why the
 recommended offer was not accepted.

(2) Proceedings under this subdivision shall be concluded no more than 150 days after the auditor provides the notification pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), unless one of the periods specified in this subdivision is extended by the mutual agreement of the city and the county. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except for those conditions that are necessary to implement an exchange of property tax revenues determined pursuant to this subdivision, the local agency formation commission shall not impose any fiscal conditions upon a city’s qualified annexation of unincorporated territory that is subject to this subdivision.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), for the purpose of determining the amount of property tax to be allocated in the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter for those local
 agencies that were affected by a jurisdictional change which was filed with the State Board of Equalization after January 1, 1978, but on or before January 1, 1979. The local agencies shall determine by resolution the amount of property tax revenues to be exchanged between and among the affected agencies and notify the auditor of the determination.

(g) For the purpose of determining the amount of property tax to be allocated in the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, for a city incorporation that was filed pursuant to Sections 54900 to 54904, inclusive, of the Government Code after January 1, 1978, but on or before January 1, 1979, the amount of property tax revenue considered to have been received by the jurisdiction for the 1978–79 fiscal year shall be equal to two-thirds of the amount of property tax revenue projected in the final local agency formation commission staff report pertaining to the incorporation multiplied by
 the proportion that the total amount of property tax revenue received by all jurisdictions within the county for the 1978–79 fiscal year bears to the total amount of property tax revenue received by all jurisdictions within the county for the 1977–78 fiscal year. Except, however, in the event that the final commission report did not specify the amount of property tax revenue projected for that incorporation, the commission shall by October 10 determine pursuant to Section 54790.3 of the Government Code the amount of property tax to be transferred to the city.

The provisions of this subdivision shall also apply to the allocation of property taxes for the 1980–81 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter for incorporations approved by the voters in June 1979.

(h) For the purpose of the computations made pursuant to this section, in the case of a district formation that was filed pursuant to Sections
 54900 to 54904, inclusive, of the Government Code after January 1, 1978, but before January 1, 1979, the amount of property tax to be allocated to the district for the 1979–80 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter shall be determined pursuant to Section 54790.3 of the Government Code.

(i) For the purposes of the computations required by this chapter, in the case of a jurisdictional change, other than a change requiring an adjustment by the auditor pursuant to subdivision (a), the auditor shall adjust the allocation of property tax revenue determined pursuant to Section 96 or 96.1 or its predecessor section, or the annual tax increment determined pursuant to Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, for each local school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools whose service area or service responsibility would be altered by the jurisdictional change, as determined as follows:

(1) The governing body of each district, county superintendent of schools, or county whose service areas or service responsibilities would be altered by the change shall determine the amount of property tax revenues to be exchanged between and among the affected jurisdictions. This determination shall be adopted by each affected jurisdiction by resolution. For the purpose of negotiation, the county auditor shall furnish the parties and the county board of education with an estimate of the property tax revenue subject to negotiation.

(2) In the event that the affected jurisdictions are unable to agree, within 60 days after the effective date of the jurisdictional change, and if all the jurisdictions are wholly within one county, the county board of education shall, by resolution, determine the amount of property tax revenue to be exchanged. If the jurisdictions are in more than one
 county, the State Board of Education shall, by resolution, within 60 days after the effective date of the jurisdictional change, determine the amount of property tax to be exchanged.

(3) Upon adoption of any resolution pursuant to this subdivision, the adopting jurisdictions or State Board of Education shall notify the county auditor who shall make the appropriate adjustments as provided in subdivision (a).

(j) For purposes of subdivision (i), the annexation by a community college district of territory within a county not previously served by a community college district is an alteration of service area. The community college district and the county shall negotiate the amount, if any, of property tax revenues to be exchanged. In these negotiations, there shall be taken into consideration the amount of revenue received from the timber yield tax and forest reserve receipts by the
 community college district in the area not previously served. In no event shall the property tax revenue to be exchanged exceed the amount of property tax revenue collected prior to the annexation for the purposes of paying tuition expenses of residents enrolled in the community college district, adjusted each year by the percentage change in population and the percentage change in the cost of living, or per capita personal income, whichever is lower, less the amount of revenue received by the community college district in the annexed area from the timber yield tax and forest reserve receipts.

(k) At any time after a jurisdictional change is effective, any of the local agencies party to the agreement to exchange property tax revenue may renegotiate the agreement with respect to the current fiscal year or subsequent fiscal years, subject to approval by all local agencies affected by the renegotiation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 37, Sec. 8.   (AB 2957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

99.01.

(a) For the purposes of Section 99, in the case of a jurisdictional change that will result in a special district providing one or more services to an area where those services have not been previously provided by any local agency, the following shall apply:

(1) The special district referred to in this subdivision and each local agency that receives an apportionment of property tax revenue from the area shall be considered local agencies whose service area or service responsibility will be altered by the jurisdictional change.

(2) The exchange of property tax among those local agencies shall be limited to property tax revenue from the annual tax increment generated in the area subject to the jurisdictional change and attributable to those local agencies.

(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 99, any special district affected by the jurisdictional change may negotiate on its own behalf, if it so chooses.

(4) If a special district involved in the negotiation (other than the district which will provide one or more services to the area where those services have not been previously provided) fails to adopt a resolution providing for the exchange of property tax revenue, the board of supervisors of the county in the area subject to the jurisdictional change is located shall determine the exchange of property tax revenue for that special district.

(b) The provisions of subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), and (j) of Section 99 not in conflict with this section shall apply. The jurisdictional changes described in subdivisions (e), (f), (g), (h), and (i) of Section 99 shall not be affected by the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

99.02.

(a) For the purposes of the computations required by this chapter for the 1985–86 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter, in the case of any transfer of property tax revenues between local agencies that is adopted and approved in conformity with subdivisions (b) and (c), the auditor shall adjust the allocation of property tax revenue determined pursuant to Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, or the annual tax increment determined pursuant to Section 96.5 or its predecessor section, for those local agencies whose allocation would be altered by the transfer.

(b) Commencing with the 1985–86 fiscal year, any local agency may, by the adoption of a resolution of its governing body or governing
 board, determine to transfer any portion of its property tax revenues that is allocable to one or more tax rate areas within the local agency to one or more other local agencies having the same tax rate area or tax rate areas. Upon the local agency’s adoption of the resolution, the local agency shall notify the board of supervisors of the county or the city council of the city within which the transfer of property tax revenues is proposed.

(c) If the board of supervisors or the city council concurs with the proposed transfer of property tax revenue, the board or council shall, by resolution, notify the county auditor of the approved transfer.

(d) Upon receipt of notification from the board of supervisors or the city council, the county auditor shall make the necessary adjustments
 specified in subdivision (a).

(e) Prior to the adoption or approval by any local agency of a transfer of property tax revenues pursuant to this section, each local agency that will be affected by the proposed transfer shall hold a public hearing to consider the effect of the proposed transfer on fees, charges, assessments, taxes, or other revenues. Notice of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation within each affected local agency.

(f) No local agency shall transfer property tax revenue pursuant to this section unless each of the following conditions exists:

(1) The transferring agency determines that revenues are available for this
 purpose.

(2) The transfer will not result in any increase in the ratio between the amount of revenues of the transferring agency that are generated by regulatory licenses, use charges, user fees, or
 assessments and the amount of revenues of the transferring agency used to finance services provided by the transferring agency.

(3) The transfer will not impair the ability of the transferring agency to provide existing services.

(4) The transfer will not result in a reduction of property tax revenues to school entities.

(5) In the case of structural fire fund property tax revenues subject to Section 6503.1 of the Government Code, where the transfer would not violate Section 6503.1 of the Government Code, the transfer is approved by the board of supervisors of the county,
 the city councils of a majority of member cities, and the agency currently receiving those funds for fire protection services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 807, Sec. 1.   (SB 302)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

99.03.
